South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Coroners, disposition of unidentifiable or unclaimed remains SECTION 1.    Section 17-5-590 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-5-590.    (A) For purposes of this section: (1) a body is unidentifiable if the dead person's identity is unknown or cannot be established after all available methods have been exhausted; and (2) a body is unclaimed if: (a) a person cannot be located to take custody of the body; or (b) there is a person to take custody of the body, but that person cannot or will not assume financial responsibility for disposition of the body. (B) If the body of a dead person is unidentifiable or unclaimed, the remains may be cremated thirty days from the date of death or date of discovery. The coroner or medical examiner may have the remains buried or interred in a cemetery in the county in which the remains were found. (C) If a coroner has possession of human remains that have been identified and the deceased person has been determined to be an unclaimed veteran, then the coroner must release the remains to a funeral home, funeral establishment, or mortuary for disposition pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 12, Title 25. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________